Hawaii statutes.
[§397-10] Judicial review. Except
where an order has already become final for failure to contest, the decision
and order of the appeals board shall be final and conclusive, unless the
director or any party to the proceedings before the appeals board obtains a
review thereof in the manner provided in chapter 91 by instituting proceedings
in the circuit court of the circuit in which the boiler, pressure system,
amusement ride, or elevator and kindred equipment is situated or such practice,
means, method, operation, or process is employed. The hearing on review shall
be on the record and the department shall be deemed a party to any such
proceedings. The court shall give precedence to such proceedings over all
other civil cases. [L 1980, c 19, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next